Utah statutes.
31A-13-101.   Scope.

This chapter applies to every employee welfare fund covering any person employed in this state except to the extent that:

(1)  federal law excludes the operation of state law;

(2)  the fund qualifies for exemption from regulation under a rule adopted by the commissioner defining funds which provide no benefits involving insurance risks; or

(3)  the commissioner determines by rule that the insurance-like risks are minimal or present no problems requiring active regulation.

